Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,108
Violations; penalties.

(1) Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in or relating to an application for membership or for the purpose of obtaining money from or a benefit in any society shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement in any verified report or declaration under oath required or authorized by sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109, or of any material fact or thing contained in a sworn statement concerning the death or disability of an insured for the purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate, shall be guilty of perjury as prescribed in section 28-915.

(3) Any person who solicits membership for, or in any manner assists in procuring membership in, any society not licensed to do business in this state shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(4) Any person guilty of a willful violation of or neglect or refusal to comply with sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 for which a penalty is not otherwise prescribed shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 37.